Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB39.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 309.312 is amended to read as follows:
(1) To be eligible for licensure by the board as an interpreter, the applicant shall submit
an application which includes:
(a) An application fee; and
(b) Current certification from a nationally recognized organization at the requisite
level for sign language interpreters, oral interpreters, or cued speech
transliterators as determined by the board and promulgated by administrative
regulation.
(2) (a) To be eligible for an educational K-12 license from the board as an
interpreter working in K-12 educational settings, the applicant shall submit
an application that includes:
1. An application fee; and
2. Current certification, assessment, or evaluation at the requisite level
for sign language interpreters, oral interpreters, or cued speech
transliterators working in K-12 educational settings as determined by
the board and promulgated by administrative regulation.
(b) This subsection shall have no impact on the eligibility of an interpreter
licensed under subsection (1) of this section to practice in an educational
setting.
(3) The board shall issue an interpreter license or educational K-12 license to an
applicant who fulfills these requirements. The front of the license shall clearly list
all certifications held by the licensee.
(4)[(3)] The board may issue a temporary license as an interpreter to an applicant who
is certified at a level below that required for licensure in subsection (1) of this
section. A temporary license shall be available for a person who is training under
Page 1 of 3
HB003910.100 - 436 - XXXX 2/25/2025 3:17 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 39/GA
the supervision of a licensed interpreter under circumstances defined by the board
in administrative regulation. A temporary license is valid for only a certain period
until the licensee achieves the minimum level of certification required for licensure
under subsection (1) of this section. A temporary license is not renewable although
extensions may be granted under circumstances defined by administrative
regulation.
(a) For graduates of a baccalaureate interpreter training program, a temporary
license shall be valid for up to one (1) year.
(b) For graduates of an associate of arts interpreter training program, a temporary
license shall be valid for up to two (2) years.
(c) For nondegree applicants, a temporary license shall be valid for up to two (2)
years.
(5)[(4)] Upon payment of the application fee, the board shall grant licensure to an
applicant holding a valid license, certificate, or equivalent issued by another state if
it is based upon standards equivalent to or exceeding the standards required by KRS
309.300 to 309.319.
Section 2. KRS 309.314 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Each person licensed as an interpreter shall annually, on or before July 1, submit to
the board current proof of nationally recognized certification, or proof required by
subsection (2)(a)2. of Section 1 of this Act, and pay a fee for the renewal of the
interpreter or educational K-12 license. The amount of the fee shall be promulgated
by administrative regulation of the board. All licenses not renewed by July 1 of
each year shall expire.
(2) A sixty (60) day grace period shall be allowed after July 1, during which time
individuals may continue to practice and may renew their licenses upon payment of
the renewal fee plus a late renewal fee as promulgated by administrative regulation
of the board.
Page 2 of 3
HB003910.100 - 436 - XXXX 2/25/2025 3:17 PM GA

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS HB 39/GA
(3) All licenses not renewed by August 31 shall terminate based on the failure of the
individual to renew in a timely manner. Upon termination, the licensee is no longer
eligible to practice in the Commonwealth.
(4) After the sixty (60) day grace period, but before five (5) years from the date of
termination, individuals with a terminated license may have their licenses reinstated
upon payment of the renewal fee plus a reinstatement fee as promulgated by
administrative regulation of the board.
(5) A suspended license is subject to expiration and termination and may be renewed as
provided in KRS 309.300 to 309.319. Renewal shall not entitle the licensee to
engage in the practice of interpreting until the suspension has ended or is otherwise
removed by the board and the right to practice is restored by the board.
(6) A revoked license is subject to expiration and termination but shall not be renewed.
If it is reinstated, the licensee shall pay the reinstatement fee as set forth in
subsection (4) of this section and the renewal fee as set forth in subsection (1) of
this section.
(7) The board may require that a person applying for renewal or reinstatement of
licensure show evidence of completion of continuing education as prescribed by the
board by administrative regulation.
Page 3 of 3
HB003910.100 - 436 - XXXX 2/25/2025 3:17 PM GA